tr: Vibrafon ses aralığı (oktav): 2 oktav; 2,5 oktav; 3 oktav; 3,5 oktav; 4 oktav; 4,3 oktav; Diğer
de: Tonumfang des Vibraphons (Oktaven): 2 Oktaven; 2,5 Oktaven; 3 Oktaven; 3,5 Oktaven; 4 Oktaven; 4,3 Oktaven; Sonstiges
en: Vibraphone range (octaves): 2 octaves; 2.5 octaves; 3 octaves; 3.5 octaves; 4 octaves; 4.3 octaves; Other
el: Εύρος βιμπραφώνου (οκτάβες): 2 οκτάβες; 2,5 οκτάβες; 3 οκτάβες; 3,5 οκτάβες; 4 οκτάβες; 4,3 οκτάβες; Άλλο
zh-TW: 電鐵琴音域 (八度): 2 個八度; 2.5 個八度; 3 個八度; 3.5 個八度; 4 個八度; 4.3 個八度; 其他
bg-BG: Диапазон на вибрафона (октави): 2 октави; 2,5 октави; 3 октави; 3,5 октави; 4 октави; 4,3 октави; Друго
nb: Vibrafonregister (oktaver): 2 oktaver; 2,5 oktaver; 3 oktaver; 3,5 oktaver; 4 oktaver; 4,3 oktaver; Annet
cs: Rozsah vibrafonu (oktávy): 2 oktávy; 2,5 oktávy; 3 oktávy; 3,5 oktávy; 4 oktávy; 4,3 oktávy; Jiné
it: Estensione del vibrafono (ottave): 2 ottave; 2,5 ottave; 3 ottave; 3,5 ottave; 4 ottave; 4,3 ottave; Altro
zh-CN: 颤音琴音域（八度）: 2 个八度; 2.5 个八度; 3 个八度; 3.5 个八度; 4 个八度; 4.3 个八度; 其他
fi: Vibrafonin ääniala (oktaaveja): 2 oktaavia; 2,5 oktaavia; 3 oktaavia; 3,5 oktaavia; 4 oktaavia; 4,3 oktaavia; Muu
ja: ビブラフォン音域 (オクターブ): 2オクターブ; 2.5オクターブ; 3オクターブ; 3.5オクターブ; 4オクターブ; 4.3オクターブ; その他
es: Rango del vibráfono (octavas): 2 octavas; 2,5 octavas; 3 octavas; 3,5 octavas; 4 octavas; 4,3 octavas; Otro
nl: Vibrafoon bereik (octaven): 2 octaven; 2,5 octaven; 3 octaven; 3,5 octaven; 4 octaven; 4,3 octaven; Overige
sl-SI: Razpon vibrafona (v oktavah): 2 oktavi; 2,5 oktave; 3 oktave; 3,5 oktave; 4 oktave; 4,3 oktave; Drugo
da: Omfang for vibrafon (oktaver): 2 oktaver; 2,5 oktaver; 3 oktaver; 3,5 oktaver; 4 oktaver; 4,3 oktaver; Andet
pl: Zakres wibrafonu (oktawy): 2 oktawy; 2,5 oktawy; 3 oktawy; 3,5 oktawy; 4 oktawy; 4,3 oktawy; Inne
ru: Диапазон вибрафона (в октавах): 2 октавы; 2,5 октавы; 3 октавы; 3,5 октавы; 4 октавы; 4,3 октавы; Другое
hu: Vibrafon hangtartománya (oktáv): 2 oktáv; 2,5 oktáv; 3 oktáv; 3,5 oktáv; 4 oktáv; 4,3 oktáv; Egyéb
pt-BR: Vibrafone extensão (oitavas): 2 oitavas; 2,5 oitavas; 3 oitavas; 3,5 oitavas; 4 oitavas; 4,3 oitavas; Outro
hr-HR: Raspon vibrafona (oktave): 2 oktave; 2,5 oktave; 3 oktave; 3,5 oktave; 4 oktave; 4,3 oktave; Ostalo
pt-PT: Alcance do vibrafone (em oitavas): 2 oitavas; 2,5 oitavas; 3 oitavas; 3,5 oitavas; 4 oitavas; 4,3 oitavas; Outro
vi: Âm vực của đàn vibraphone (quãng tám): 2 quãng tám; 2,5 quãng tám; 3 quãng tám; 3,5 quãng tám; 4 quãng tám; 4,3 quãng tám; Khác
th: ช่วงเสียงของไวบราโฟน (อ็อกเทฟ): 2 ออกเตฟ; 2.5 ออกเตฟ; 3 ออกเตฟ; 3.5 ออกเตฟ; 4 ออกเตฟ; 4.3 ออกเตฟ; อื่นๆ
ko: 비브라폰 음역(옥타브): 2옥타브; 2.5옥타브; 3옥타브; 3.5옥타브; 4옥타브; 4.3옥타브; 기타
sv: Vibrafonomfång (oktaver): 2 oktaver; 2,5 oktaver; 3 oktaver; 3,5 oktaver; 4 oktaver; 4,3 oktaver; Övrigt
fr: Étendue du vibraphone (octaves): 2 octaves; 2,5 octaves; 3 octaves; 3,5 octaves; 4 octaves; 4,3 octaves; Autre
sk-SK: Rozsah vibrafónu (oktávy): 2 oktávy; 2,5 oktávy; 3 oktávy; 3,5 oktávy; 4 oktávy; 4,3 oktávy; Iné
lt-LT: Vibrafono diapazonas (oktavos): 2 oktavos; 2,5 oktavos; 3 oktavos; 3,5 oktavos; 4 oktavos; 4,3 oktavos; Kita
ro-RO: Gama vibrafonului (octave): 2 octave; 2,5 octave; 3 octave; 3,5 octave; 4 octave; 4,3 octave; Altele